Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 1804. RATES AND FORMS FOR NATIONAL DEFENSE PROJECTS

Sec. 1804.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to insurance in relation to a national defense project in this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1804.002. SPECIAL RATES AND RATING PLANS FOR CASUALTY INSURANCE. (a) The commissioner may promulgate special rates and special rating plans for workers' compensation insurance, automobile insurance, and other lines of casualty insurance, to apply only to the construction or operation of a national defense project.

(b) The commissioner may promulgate the special rates and special rating plans separately for each class of insurance or in combination for all classes of insurance.

(c) The commissioner may adopt rules as may be necessary, proper, or advisable to place in effect special rates and special rating plans promulgated under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1804.003. SPECIAL RATES AND FORMS FOR MATERIAL DAMAGE INSURANCE. (a) The commissioner may promulgate special rates and forms for fire insurance, windstorm insurance, and other kinds of material damage insurance required or used on a national defense project.

(b) The commissioner may adopt rules incidental to the business described by Subsection (a) and necessary to place in effect special rates and forms promulgated under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.